Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.35.790

Other laws not repealed or limited.

RCW 28B.35.700 through 28B.35.790 as now or hereafter amended is concurrent with other legislation with reference to providing funds for the construction of buildings at the regional universities or The Evergreen State College and is not to be construed as repealing or limiting any existing provision of law with reference thereto.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 91; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.40.790. Prior: 1961 ex.s. c 14 s 10. Formerly RCW 28B.40.790; 28.81.590.]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.